Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202658-712
Repealed. Laws 2026, LB768, § 22.

This section was amended by Laws 2026, LB759, section 9, and repealed by Laws 2026, LB768, section 22. The repeal by LB768 became effective July 18, 2026, and the section has been deleted.